trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
    <pardef n="A_DUR">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dur</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ent_ger"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dut</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl_fem"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_c_velar"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PresInd_u"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="esborrat_h"/>
        <par n="ImpInd_23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_i_cons"/>
        <par n="ImpInd_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dú</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_i_cons"/>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dux</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dux</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="IndefInd_2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dux</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dux</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dugu</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="IndefInd_2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>dugu</i>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dur</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dur</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Cond"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dug</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PresSubj_g"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dux</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>duxe</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dugu</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dugue</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>duxe</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_ra"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dugue</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_ra"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dugu</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dux</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>duu</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_i_cons"/>
        <p>
          <l>ts</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dugats</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dugau</l>
          <r>dur<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <par n="A_DUR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>a</i>
        <par n="A_DUR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>in</i>
        <par n="A_DUR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>per</i>
        <par n="A_DUR"/>
      </e>
